Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4101.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 46, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 46-232, to read: START_STATUTE46-232. Department of economic security; supplemental nutrition assistance program; waiver; definitions A. The director of the department of economic security shall request a waiver from the united states department of agriculture to allow supplemental nutrition assistance program enrollees to purchase hot foods and prepared foods. If the waiver is granted, the director shall allow supplemental nutrition assistance program enrollees to purchase hot foods and prepared foods.  If the waiver is not granted, the director shall request a waiver annually until the waiver is granted. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "hot foods" means food products that are sold hot at the point of sale. 2. "Prepared foods" means food products that are made by a retailer and that require no additional preparation before immediate consumption. END_STATUTE